District of Columbia statutes.
3-2005

Repealed

Appeal from action of Board.

Repealed.

June 7, 1938, 52 Stat. 613, ch. 321, § 5
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245,§ 38(b), 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142

Repeal of Law 9-245

See note to § 3-2001.

1973 Ed., § 2-1305.
1981 Ed., § 2-905.